Missouri, session 2026, HB2715.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 213.010 and 213.111, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 213.010 and 213.111, to read as follows:
213.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Age", an age of forty or more years but less than seventy years, except that it
shall not be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to require the compulsory
retirement of any person who has attained the age of sixty-five and who, for the two-year
period immediately before retirement, is employed in a bona fide executive or high policy-
making position, if such person is entitled to an immediate nonforfeitable annual retirement
benefit from a pension, profit sharing, savings or deferred compensation plan, or any
combination of such plans, of the employer, which equals, in the aggregate, at least forty-four
thousand dollars;
(2) "Because" or "because of", as it relates to the adverse decision or action, the
protected criterion was the motivating factor;
(3) "Commission", the Missouri commission on human rights;
(4) "Complainant", a person who has filed a complaint with the commission alleging
that another person has engaged in a prohibited discriminatory practice;
(5) "Disability", a physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or
more of a person's major life activities, being regarded as having such an impairment, or a
record of having such an impairment, which with or without reasonable accommodation does
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2715 2
not interfere with performing the job, utilizing the place of public accommodation, or
occupying the dwelling in question. For purposes of this chapter, the term "disability" does
not include current, illegal use of or addiction to a controlled substance as such term is
defined by section 195.010; however, a person may be considered to have a disability if that
person:
(a) Has successfully completed a supervised drug rehabilitation program and is no
longer engaging in the illegal use of, and is not currently addicted to, a controlled substance or
has otherwise been rehabilitated successfully and is no longer engaging in such use and is not
currently addicted;
(b) Is participating in a supervised rehabilitation program and is no longer engaging
in illegal use of controlled substances; or
(c) Is erroneously regarded as currently illegally using, or being addicted to, a
controlled substance;
(6) "Discrimination", conduct proscribed herein, taken because of race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, or age as it relates to employment, disability, or
familial status as it relates to housing;
(7) "Dwelling", any building, structure or portion thereof which is occupied as, or
designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or more families, and any vacant
land which is offered for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure or portion thereof;
(8) "Employer", a person engaged in an industry affecting commerce who has six or
more employees for each working day in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the
current or preceding calendar year, and shall include the state, or any political or civil
subdivision thereof, or any person employing six or more persons within the state but does
not include corporations and associations owned or operated by religious or sectarian
organizations. "Employer" shall not include:
(a) The United States;
(b) A corporation wholly owned by the government of the United States;
(c) An individual employed by an employer;
(d) An Indian tribe;
(e) Any department or agency of the District of Columbia subject by statute to
procedures of the competitive service, as defined in 5 U.S.C. Section [2101] 2102; or
(f) A bona fide private membership club, other than a labor organization, that is
exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c);
(9) "Employment agency" includes any person or agency, public or private, regularly
undertaking with or without compensation to procure employees for an employer or to
procure for employees opportunities to work for an employer;

HB 2715 3
(10) "Executive director", the executive director of the Missouri commission on
human rights;
(11) "Familial status", one or more individuals who have not attained the age of
eighteen years being domiciled with:
(a) A parent or another person having legal custody of such individual; or
(b) The designee of such parent or other person having such custody, with the written
permission of such parent or other person. The protections afforded against discrimination
because of familial status shall apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of
securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of eighteen years;
(12) "Human rights fund", a fund established to receive civil penalties as required by
federal regulations and as set forth by subdivision (2) of subsection 11 of section 213.075, and
which will be disbursed to offset additional expenses related to compliance with the
Department of Housing and Urban Development regulations;
(13) "Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for the purpose, in
whole or in part, of collective bargaining or of dealing with employers concerning grievances,
terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in relation to
employment;
(14) "Local commissions", any commission or agency established prior to August 13,
1986, by an ordinance or order adopted by the governing body of any city, constitutional
charter city, town, village, or county;
(15) "Person" includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,
associations, organizations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,
joint stock companies, trusts, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, fiduciaries, or other
organized groups of persons;
(16) "Places of public accommodation", all places or businesses offering or holding
out to the general public, goods, services, privileges, facilities, advantages or
accommodations for the peace, comfort, health, welfare and safety of the general public or
such public places providing food, shelter, recreation and amusement, including, but not
limited to:
(a) Any inn, hotel, motel, or other establishment which provides lodging to transient
guests, other than an establishment located within a building which contains not more than
five rooms for rent or hire and which is actually occupied by the proprietor of such
establishment as his residence;
(b) Any restaurant, cafeteria, lunchroom, lunch counter, soda fountain, or other
facility principally engaged in selling food for consumption on the premises, including, but
not limited to, any such facility located on the premises of any retail establishment;

HB 2715 4
(c) Any gasoline station, including all facilities located on the premises of such
gasoline station and made available to the patrons thereof;
(d) Any motion picture house, theater, concert hall, sports arena, stadium, or other
place of exhibition or entertainment;
(e) Any public facility owned, operated, or managed by or on behalf of this state or
any agency or subdivision thereof, or any public corporation; and any such facility supported
in whole or in part by public funds;
(f) Any establishment which is physically located within the premises of any
establishment otherwise covered by this section or within the premises of which is physically
100 located any such covered establishment, and which holds itself out as serving patrons of such
101 covered establishment;
102 (17) "Public employer", any entity for which coverage is provided by section
103 105.711;
104 (18) "Rent" includes to lease, to sublease, to let and otherwise to grant for
105 consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by the occupant;
106 [(18)] (19) "Respondent", a person who is alleged to have engaged in a prohibited
107 discriminatory practice in a complaint filed with the commission;
108 [(19)] (20) "The motivating factor", the employee's protected classification actually
109 played a role in the adverse action or decision and had a determinative influence on the
110 adverse decision or action;
111 [(20)] (21) "Unlawful discriminatory practice", any act that is unlawful under this
112 chapter.
213.111. 1. If, after one hundred eighty days from the filing of a complaint alleging
an unlawful discriminatory practice pursuant to section 213.055, 213.065 or 213.070 to the
extent that the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or involves a violation of section
213.055 or 213.065, or subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 213.070 as it relates to
employment and public accommodations, the commission has not completed its
administrative processing and the person aggrieved so requests in writing, the commission
shall issue to the person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or her right to bring a
civil action within ninety days of such notice against the respondent named in the complaint.
If, after the filing of a complaint pursuant to sections 213.040, 213.045, 213.050 and 213.070,
to the extent that the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or involves a violation of
sections 213.040, 213.045 and 213.050, or subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 213.070
as it relates to housing, and the person aggrieved so requests in writing, the commission shall
issue to the person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or her right to bring a civil
action within ninety days of such notice against the respondent named in the complaint. The
commission may not at any other time or for any other reason issue a letter indicating a

HB 2715 5
complainant's right to bring a civil action. Such an action may be brought in any circuit court
in any county in which the unlawful discriminatory practice is alleged to have been
committed, either before a circuit or associate circuit judge. Upon issuance of this notice, the
commission shall terminate all proceedings relating to the complaint. No person may file or
reinstate a complaint with the commission after the issuance of a notice under this section
relating to the same practice or act. Any action brought in court under this section shall be
filed within ninety days from the date of the commission's notification letter to the individual
but no later than two years after the alleged cause occurred or its reasonable discovery by the
alleged injured party.
2. The court may grant as relief, as it deems appropriate, any permanent or temporary
injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order, and may award to the plaintiff actual
and punitive damages, and, in cases not involving a public employer as one of the
defendants, the courtmay award court costs and reasonable [attorney] attorney'sfees to the
prevailing party, other than a state agency or commission or a local commission; except that, a
prevailing respondent may be awarded reasonable [attorney] attorney's fees only upon a
showing that the case was without foundation.
3. Any party to any action initiated under this section has a right to a trial by jury.
4. The sum of the amount of actual damages, including damages for future pecuniary
losses, emotional pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, loss of enjoyment of life,
and other nonpecuniary losses, and punitive damages awarded under this section shall not
exceed for each complaining party:
(1) Actual back pay and interest on back pay; and
(2) (a) In the case of a respondent who has more than five and fewer than one
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, fifty thousand dollars;
(b) In the case of a respondent who has more than one hundred and fewer than two
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, one hundred thousand dollars;
(c) In the case of a respondent who has more than two hundred and fewer than five
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, two hundred thousand dollars; or
(d) In the case of a respondent who has more than five hundred employees in each of
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year, five hundred
thousand dollars.
5. In any employment-related civil action brought under this chapter, the plaintiff
shall bear the burden of proving the alleged unlawful decision or action was made or taken

HB 2715 6
because of his or her protected classification and was the direct proximate cause of the
claimed damages.
✔